Illinois, session 104th, HB4537.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 21-90, 21-110, 21-115, 21-150, 21-160, 21-190, 621-205, 21-215, 21-225, 21-305, 21-310, 21-350, 22-5, 22-10, 722-40, and 22-65 and by adding Sections 1-21, 1-147, 1-148, 821-191, 21-192, 21-296, 21-301, 21-302, and 22-42 as follows: 9    (35 ILCS 200/1-21 new)10    Sec. 1-21. Interested party. "Interested party" means any 11party having an interest in the property as revealed by a title 12examination of public records. "Interested party" does not 13include the holder of the benefit or burden of any easement 14whose interest is properly recorded, which interest shall 15remain unaffected by property tax enforcement proceedings. 16    (35 ILCS 200/1-147 new)17    Sec. 1-147. Tax deed auction. "Tax deed auction" means the 18transfer of property by an auction conducted in accordance 19with Sections 21-90, 22-10, 22-40, or 22-42 of this Code. 20    (35 ILCS 200/1-148 new)21    Sec. 1-148. Tax sale. "Tax sale" means the transfer of a   HB4537 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1property tax lien or tax certificate in accordance with 2Sections 21-90, 21-145, 21-205, 21-225, 21-250, or 21-260 of 3this Code. 4    (35 ILCS 200/21-90)5    Sec. 21-90. Purchase and sale by county; distribution of 6proceeds. 7    (a) When any property is offered at a tax for sale under 8any of the provisions of this Code, the county board of the 9county in which the property is located, in its discretion, 10may bid, or, in the case of forfeited property, may apply to 11purchase it or otherwise acquire the tax lien or certificate 12in the name of the county as trustee for all taxing districts 13having an interest in the property's taxes or special 14assessments for the nonpayment of which the property is sold. 15The presiding officer of the county board, with the advice and 16consent of the board, may appoint on its behalf some officer, 17person, or entity to attend such sales, bid on tax liens or 18certificates, and act on behalf of the county when exercising 19its authority under this Section. The county shall apply on 20the bid or purchase the unpaid taxes and special assessments 21due upon the property. No cash need be paid. 22    (b) The county, as trustee for all taxing districts having 23an interest in the property's taxes or special assessments, 24shall be the designated holder of all tax liens or 25certificates that are forfeited to the State or county or   HB4537 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1otherwise acquired by the county pursuant to subsection (a) of 2this Section or Sections 21-190 through 21-255 of this Code. 3No cash need be paid for any tax lien or certificate acquired 4by the county pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section or 5Sections 21-190 through 21-255 of this Code the forfeited tax 6lien or certificate. 7    (c) For any tax lien or certificate acquired under 8subsection (a) or (b) of this Section, or for any property 9otherwise purchased or acquired by the county pursuant to 10Sections 21-190 to 21-255 of this Code, the county may take 11steps necessary to acquire or sell title to the property and 12may manage and operate the property, including, but not 13limited to, mowing of grass, removal of nuisance greenery, 14removal of garbage, waste, debris or other materials, or the 15demolition, repair, or remediation of unsafe structures. When 16a county, or other taxing district within the county, is a 17petitioner for a tax deed, no filing fee shall be required. 18When a county or other taxing district within the county is the 19petitioner for a tax deed, one petition may be filed including 20all parcels that are tax delinquent within the county or 21taxing district, and any publication made under Section 22-20 22of this Code may combine all such parcels within a single 23notice. The notice may include the property street address as 24listed on the most recent available tax bills, if available, 25and shall list the Property Index Number of the parcels for 26informational purposes. The county, as tax creditor and as   HB4537 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1trustee for other tax creditors, or other taxing district 2within the county, shall not be required to allege and prove 3that all taxes and special assessments which become due and 4payable after the sale or forfeiture to the county have been 5paid nor shall the county be required to pay the subsequently 6accruing taxes or special assessments at any time. The county 7board or its designee may prohibit the county collector from 8including the property in the tax sale of one or more 9subsequent years. The lien of taxes and special assessments 10which become due and payable after a tax sale to a county shall 11merge in the fee title of the county, or other taxing district 12within the county, on the issuance of a deed.13    The county may sell any property acquired with authority 14provided in this Section, or assign any tax certificate to any 15party, including, but not limited to, taxing districts, 16municipalities, land banks created pursuant to Illinois law, 17or non-profit developers focused on constructing affordable 18housing. 19    The assigned tax certificate shall be void with no further 20rights given to the assignee, including no right to refund or 21reimbursement, if a tax deed resulting from a tax deed auction 22has not been recorded within 4 years after the date of the 23assignment unless a court extends the assignment period as 24provided in this Section. Upon a motion by the assignee, a 25court may toll the 4-year deadline for a specified period of 26time if the court finds the assignee is prevented from   HB4537 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1obtaining or recording a deed by injunction or order of any 2court, by the refusal or inability of any court to act upon the 3application for a tax deed, by a municipality's refusal to 4issue necessary transfer stamps or approvals for recording, or 5by the refusal of the clerk to execute the deed. If an assigned 6tax certificate is void under this Section, it shall be 7forfeited to the county and held as a valid certificate of sale 8in the county's name pursuant to this Section 21-90. The 9proceeds of any sale or assignment under this Section, less 10all costs of the county incurred in the acquisition, 11operation, maintenance, and sale of the property or assignment 12of the tax certificate, including all costs associated with 13county staff and overhead used to perform the duties of the 14trustee set forth in this Section, and less any surplus 15payments to previous owners, shall be distributed to the 16taxing districts in proportion to their respective interests 17therein.18    Under Sections 21-110, 21-115, 21-120, and 21-190, a 19county may bid or purchase only in the absence of other 20bidders.21    (d) The county, as trustee, may elect to acquire or sell 22tax delinquent property under either the provisions of this 23Section or under Sections 22-40 and 22-42 of this Code. For any 24tax lien or certificate acquired by a county under this Code, 25the county may take steps necessary to acquire title to the 26property, including a final overbid at the close of any public   HB4537 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1tax deed auction or judicial sale conveying title to property 2intended to be developed by a unit of local government.3    (e) When the county, as trustee, files a petition for one 4or more delinquent tax liens or certificates, the county may 5request, pursuant to Section 22-40, that the court issue a tax 6deed to the county, as trustee, without holding a judicial tax 7deed auction. If the county requests a tax deed without a tax 8deed auction pursuant to Section 22-40 and 22-42 of this Code, 9the Order for Issuance of Tax Deed shall identify the total 10amount of delinquent taxes and penalties, municipal 11advancements identified in Section 22-35, pro rata county 12costs incurred pursuant to subsections (a) through (c) of this 13Section, and other posted costs for each parcel conveyed. This 14judgment amount shall be considered the debt owed to the 15county, as trustee. The Order for Issuance of Tax Deed shall 16also include an order for the county to offer each parcel 17acquired by the county in this manner for sale at a public tax 18deed auction, as set forth in subsection (f) of this Section, 19within 120 days of recording the tax deed. The purpose of the 20public tax deed auction as set forth in subsection (f) of this 21Section is to determine whether and to what extent there are 22surplus funds owed by the county, as trustee, to the former 23owner that exceed the judgment amount indicated in the Order 24for Issuance of Tax Deed. If no party bids more than this 25amount at the public tax deed auction described in subsection 26(f), then the purchase price will be recorded as the amount of   HB4537 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1the debt owed to the county, as trustee, as reflected in the 2Order for Issuance of Tax Deed, and there are no surplus funds 3owed to the previous owner.4    (f) County tax deed auctions. Tax deed auctions held by 5the county pursuant to this Section shall conform with the 6following requirements.7        (1) Notice. The county or its agent shall give notice 8    of the tax deed auction with the following information:9            (A) the Property Identification Number and 10        property address listed on the latest tax bill;11            (B) the time and place of the auction;12            (C) the terms of the auction; and13            (D) the total amount of delinquent taxes and 14        penalties, municipal advancements identified in 15        Section 22-35, pro rata county costs incurred pursuant 16        to subsections (a) through (c) of Section 21-90, and 17        other posted costs.18        In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 19    notice of tax deed auction shall be in clear and concise 20    language, together with a notice in Spanish, Polish, and 21    Mandarin Chinese, stating that the notice of tax deed 22    auction affects important legal rights and should be 23    translated immediately. In counties with fewer than 24    3,000,000 inhabitants, the notice of tax deed auction may 25    include a notice in one or more foreign languages, stating 26    that the notice of tax deed auction affects important   HB4537 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    legal rights and should be translated immediately. In all 2    counties, the notice of tax deed auction shall be mailed, 3    to the address at which service of process was made, via 4    first class mail to all interested parties and via first 5    class mail and certified mail to the owner of the property 6    at the time the petition was filed. If service of process 7    was made in any manner other than personal service, 8    substitute service, corporate service, or government 9    service, notice shall be mailed via first class mail to 10    all addresses included in the notice served pursuant to 11    Section 22-25. The notice shall include a sworn 12    certificate of service signed by the party sending the 13    notice attesting to the fact that the notice of tax deed 14    auction was placed in the mail at least 30 calendar days 15    prior to the date of the auction. At least 30 days prior to 16    the date of the auction, the county or its agent must post 17    on its website a list of all properties that are to be 18    offered for sale at the tax deed auction and the other 19    information contained in the notice of tax deed auction. 20    The person conducting the auction shall engage in 21    reasonable activities to promote and market the sale to 22    encourage and facilitate bidding, including listing the 23    property on the county's or its agent's website, other 24    real estate websites, and conducting email campaigns.25        (2) Minimum bid. In counties with 3,000,000 or more 26    inhabitants, the county shall establish minimum bids at   HB4537 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    any tax deed auction held pursuant to this Section. The 2    minimum bid shall equal the total amount of delinquent 3    taxes and penalties, municipal advancements identified in 4    Section 22-35, pro rata county costs incurred pursuant to 5    subsections (a) through (c) of Section 21-90, and other 6    posted costs for the auctioned parcel as identified in the 7    Order for Issuance of Tax Deed. In counties with less than 8    3,000,000 inhabitants, the county may establish minimum 9    bids at any tax deed auction held pursuant to this 10    Section. The minimum bid may equal the total amount of 11    delinquent taxes and penalties, municipal advancements 12    identified in Section 22-35, pro rata county costs 13    incurred pursuant to subsections (a) through (c) of 14    Section 21-90, and other posted costs, for the auctioned 15    parcel, as identified in the Order for Issuance of Tax 16    Deed. As used in this Section, "pro rata county costs" may 17    include costs incurred by the county in filing one 18    petition for more than one delinquent tax lien or 19    certificate, and all costs related to the filing of the 20    one petition and obtaining tax deeds for the liens and 21    certificates identified in the one petition, reasonably 22    apportioned and included in the total costs for each 23    individual tax deed issued pursuant to the petition.24        (3) Adjournment. If a tax deed auction is postponed, 25    adjourned, or re-scheduled to occur less than 60 days 26    after the last scheduled auction, the county shall   HB4537 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    announce the date, time and place upon which the adjourned 2    tax deed auction shall be held at the time, date, and 3    location in the notice. At a minimum, this announcement 4    shall be posted on the website of the county, as trustee, 5    or the county treasurer in the same location where the 6    county posted the list of all properties that are to be 7    sold at the auction as required in paragraph (1) of 8    subsection (f) of Section 21-90. The county is not 9    required to send additional notice of any postponed tax 10    deed auction as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection 11    (f) of Section 21-90. Notwithstanding any language to the 12    contrary, for tax deed auctions that are conducted more 13    than 60 days after the date in the required notice, the 14    county shall send notice of the adjourned tax deed auction 15    in accordance with paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of 16    Section 21-90.17        (4) Payment for winning bid. The county shall 18    participate in a public tax deed auction in the same 19    manner as any other bidder. No matter the terms of the tax 20    deed auction prescribed by the county, if the county is 21    the winning bidder, then the county is required to pay the 22    full amount of any county bid that exceeds the debt owed to 23    the county, as identified in subsection (e) of Section 24    21-90 prior to the deposit of surplus funds with the 25    treasurer of the county as set forth in paragraph (6) of 26    this Section.  HB4537 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1        (5) Marketability of title. Failure to hold a public 2    tax deed auction of the parcels received within the 3    180-day period shall not affect the validity of the 4    recorded deed, the Order for Issuance of Tax Deed, or 5    otherwise affect the marketability of title, but the 6    county is prohibited from transferring those parcels or 7    assigning the recorded deed without holding a public tax 8    deed auction pursuant to subsection (f) of Section 21-90 9    or a judicial tax deed auction pursuant to Section 22-40.10        (6) Disbursement of surplus funds. To the extent that 11    the winning bid at the tax deed auction exceeds the amount 12    of the tax deed judgment as defined in subsection (e) of 13    Section 21-90, the county trustee shall, within 30 days of 14    the auction sale, deposit the surplus funds with the 15    treasurer of the county in which the subject property 16    lies. Within 60 days of the tax deed auction at which the 17    property was purchased, the county, as trustee, shall send 18    a notice to interested parties in the underlying case, 19    stating that the previous owner is entitled to a 20    distribution of surplus proceeds and may file a claim 21    pursuant to subsection (i) of Section 22-42. In counties 22    with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the notice shall be in 23    clear and concise language, together with a notice in 24    Spanish, Polish, and Mandarin Chinese, stating that the 25    notice affects important legal rights and should be 26    translated immediately. In counties with fewer than   HB4537 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    3,000,000 inhabitants, the notice may include a notice in 2    one or more foreign languages, stating that the notice 3    affects important legal rights and should be translated 4    immediately. 5(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (35 ILCS 200/21-110)7    Sec. 21-110. Published notice of annual application for 8judgment and sale; delinquent taxes. At any time after all 9taxes have become delinquent in any year, the Collector shall 10publish an advertisement, giving notice of the intended 11application for judgment and tax sale of the delinquent 12properties. The advertisement may include the property street 13address on file with the county collector, if available, and 14shall include the PIN number of each delinquent property. If 15the county has provided notice to the Collector of its intent 16to acquire property offered at an annual tax sale in the manner 17described in subsection (b) of Section 21-190, the 18advertisement shall indicate which properties the county 19intends to acquire next to the PIN number and address, if any, 20listed in the advertisement. If the county has indicated its 21intent or is required to acquire all properties offered at 22such a tax sale in accordance with subsection (b) or (c) of 23Section 21-190, a sentence indicating such shall precede the 24list of PIN numbers and addresses in the advertisement in 25clear, bolded language. Except as provided below, the   HB4537 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1advertisement shall be in a newspaper published in the 2township or road district in which the properties are located. 3If there is no newspaper published in the township or road 4district, then the notice shall be published in some newspaper 5in the same county as the township or road district, to be 6selected by the county collector. When the property is in a 7city with more than 1,000,000 inhabitants, the advertisement 8may be in any newspaper published in the same county. When the 9property is in an incorporated town which has superseded a 10civil township, the advertisement shall be in a newspaper 11published in the incorporated town or if there is no such 12newspaper, then in a newspaper published in the county.13    The provisions of this Section relating to the time when 14the Collector shall advertise intended application for 15judgment for sale are subject to modification by the governing 16authority of a county in accordance with the provisions of 17subsection (c) of Section 21-40.18(Source: P.A. 97-557, eff. 7-1-12.) 19    (35 ILCS 200/21-115)20    Sec. 21-115. Times of publication of notice. The 21advertisement shall be published once at least 10 days before 22the day on which judgment is to be applied for, and shall 23contain a list of the delinquent properties upon which the 24taxes or any part thereof remain due and unpaid, the names of 25owners, if known, the total amount due, and the year or years   HB4537 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1for which they are due, and whether the county intends to 2purchase the property in accordance with subsections (b) or 3(c) of Section 21-190 if a judgment is entered against the 4property. In counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, 5advertisement shall include notice of the registration 6requirement for persons bidding at the sale. Properties upon 7which taxes have been paid in full under protest shall not be 8included in the list.9    The collector shall give notice that he or she will apply 10to the circuit court on a specified day for judgment against 11the properties for the taxes, and costs, and for an order for a 12tax sale of to sell the properties for the satisfaction of the 13amount due.14    The collector shall also give notice of a date within the 15next 5 business days after the date of application on which all 16the properties for the tax sale of which an order is made will 17either be sold to the county in accordance with subsections 18(b) or (c) of Section 21-190 or be exposed to public tax sale 19at a location within the county designated by the county 20collector, for the amount of taxes, and cost due. The 21advertisement published according to the provisions of this 22Section shall be deemed to be sufficient notice of the 23intended application for judgment and of a tax sale the sale of 24properties under the order of the court. A county with fewer 25than 3,000,000 inhabitants may, by joint agreement, combine 26its tax sale with the tax sale of one or more other contiguous   HB4537 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1counties; such a joint tax sale shall be held at a location in 2one of the participating counties. Notwithstanding the 3provisions of this Section and Section 21-110, in the 10 years 4following the completion of a general reassessment of property 5in any county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, made under 6an order of the Department, the publication shall be made not 7sooner than 10 days nor more than 90 days after the date when 8all unpaid taxes on property have become delinquent. 9(Source: P.A. 101-379, eff. 1-1-20.) 10    (35 ILCS 200/21-150)11    Sec. 21-150. Time of applying for judgment. Except as 12otherwise provided in this Section or by ordinance or 13resolution enacted under subsection (c) of Section 21-40, in 14any county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, all 15applications for judgment and order of sale for taxes and 16special assessments on delinquent properties shall be made 17within 90 days after the second installment due date. In Cook 18County, all applications for judgment and order of sale for 19taxes and special assessments on delinquent properties shall 20be made (i) by July 1, 2011 for tax year 2009, (ii) by July 1, 212012 for tax year 2010, (iii) by July 1, 2013 for tax year 222011, (iv) by July 1, 2014 for tax year 2012, (v) by July 1, 232015 for tax year 2013, (vi) by May 1, 2016 for tax year 2014, 24(vii) by March 1, 2017 for tax year 2015, (viii) by April 1 of 25the next calendar year after the second installment due date   HB4537 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1for tax year 2016 and 2017, and (ix) within 365 days of the 2second installment due date for each tax year thereafter. 3    Notwithstanding these dates, in Cook County, the 4application for judgment and order of sale for the 2018 annual 5tax sale that would normally be held in calendar year 2020 6shall not be filed earlier than the first day of the first 7month during which there is no longer a statewide COVID-19 8public health emergency, as evidenced by an effective disaster 9declaration of the Governor covering all counties in the 10State, except that in no event may this application for 11judgment and order of sale be filed later than October 1, 2021. 12When a tax sale is delayed because of a statewide COVID-19 13public health emergency, no subsequent annual tax sale may 14begin earlier than 180 days after the last day of the prior 15delayed tax sale, and no scavenger tax sale may begin earlier 16than 90 days after the last day of the prior delayed tax sale. 17In those counties which have adopted an ordinance under 18Section 21-40, the application for judgment and order of sale 19for delinquent taxes shall be made in December. 20    Notwithstanding these dates, in Cook County, the 21application for judgment and order of sale for the 2023 annual 22tax sale that would normally be held in calendar year 2025 23shall be filed on or before December 1, 2026. Notwithstanding 24Sections 9-260, 18-250, 20-100, 21-15, 21-25, and 21-45, in 25Cook County, interest shall not accrue between September 2, 262025 and January 1, 2027 on delinquent warrant year 2023 tax   HB4537 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1balances. 2    Notwithstanding these dates, in Cook County, the 3application for judgment and order of sale for the 2024 annual 4tax sale that would normally be held in calendar year 2026 5shall be filed on or before April 1, 2027. 6    In the 10 years next following the completion of a general 7reassessment of property in any county with 3,000,000 or more 8inhabitants, made under an order of the Department, 9applications for judgment and order of sale shall be made as 10soon as may be and on the day specified in the advertisement 11required by Section 21-110 and 21-115. If for any cause the 12court is not held on the day specified, the cause shall stand 13continued, and it shall be unnecessary to re-advertise the 14list or notice.15    Within 30 days after the day specified for the application 16for judgment the court shall hear and determine the matter. If 17judgment is rendered, the sale shall begin on the date within 5 18business days specified in the notice as provided in Section 1921-115. If the collector is prevented from advertising and 20obtaining judgment within the time periods specified by this 21Section, the collector may obtain judgment at any time 22thereafter; but if the failure arises by the county 23collector's not complying with any of the requirements of this 24Code, he or she shall be held on his or her official bond for 25the full amount of all taxes and special assessments charged 26against him or her. Any failure on the part of the county   HB4537 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1collector shall not be allowed as a valid objection to the 2collection of any tax or assessment, or to entry of a judgment 3against any delinquent properties included in the application 4of the county collector.5    As used in this Section, "warrant year" means the year 6preceding the calendar year in which the taxes first became 7due and payable. 8(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25; 104-460, eff. 2-27-26.) 9    (35 ILCS 200/21-160)10    Sec. 21-160. Annual tax judgment, sale, redemption, and 11forfeiture record. The collector shall transcribe into a 12record prepared for that purpose, and known as the annual tax 13judgment, tax sale, redemption and forfeiture record, the list 14of delinquent properties. On or before the day on which 15application for judgment is to be made, the record shall be 16made out in numerical order and contain all the information 17necessary to be recorded.18    The record shall set forth the name of the owner, if known; 19the description of the property; the year or years for which 20the tax or, in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 21the tax or special assessments is due; the valuation on which 22the tax is extended; the amount of the consolidated and other 23taxes or in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 24consolidated and other taxes and special assessments; the 25costs; and the total amount of charges against the property.  HB4537 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    The final record shall also be ruled in columns, to show in 2counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants the withdrawal of 3any special assessments from collection and in all counties to 4show the amount paid before entry of judgment; the amount of 5judgment and a column for remarks; the amount paid before sale 6and after entry of judgment; the amount of the sale; amount of 7interest or penalty; amount of cost; amount forfeited to the 8State; date of sale; acres or part sold; name of purchaser; 9amount of sale and penalty; taxes of succeeding years; 10interest and when paid, interest and cost; total amount of 11redemption; date of redemption; when deed executed; by whom 12redeemed; and a column for remarks or receipt of redemption 13money.14    The final record shall be kept in the office of the county 15clerk.16(Source: P.A. 95-269, eff. 8-17-07.) 17    (35 ILCS 200/21-190)18    Sec. 21-190. Entry of judgment for tax sale. 19    (a) If judgment is rendered against any property for any 20tax or, in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, for 21any tax or special assessment, the county collector shall, 22after publishing a notice for sale in compliance with the 23requirements of Sections 21-110, and 21-115, or 21-120, 24proceed to conduct a tax sale offer the property for sale 25pursuant to the judgment. However, in the case of an appeal   HB4537 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1from the judgment, if the party, when filing notice of appeal 2deposits with the county collector the amount of the judgment 3and costs, the collector shall not conduct a tax sale sell the 4property until the appeal is disposed of.5    (b) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, a 6county board may, in its discretion, submit to the collector a 7list of any properties for which an application for judgment 8has been made pursuant to Section 21-150 of this Code. The 9county's submission of this list shall be considered its offer 10to purchase the property or properties included on this list 11at the tax sale, pursuant to the county's authority in 12subsection (a) of Section 21-90, so long as a judgment and 13order for tax sale is entered for the property in accordance 14with Sections 21-175 and 21-180 of this Code. Such list shall 15be submitted to the county collector at least 10 days prior to 16the publication of any notice for tax sale required in 17subsection (a) of this Section and in compliance with Sections 1821-110, 21-115, and 21-120 of this Code.19    (c) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, for 20the seventh tax sale conducted after the effective date of 21this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and for all 22subsequent tax sales, the county shall exercise its authority 23under subsection (a) of Section 21-90 of this Code and offer to 24purchase or otherwise acquire for the total tax amount due all 25properties offered at a tax sale conducted pursuant to a 26judgment and order for tax sale issued in accordance with   HB4537 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1Sections 21-175 and 21-180 of this Code. For the first 6 tax 2sales conducted after the effective date of this amendatory 3Act of the 104th General Assembly, except as provided in 4Section 21-191, the county shall not exercise its authority 5under subsection (a) of Section 21-90 and offer to purchase or 6otherwise acquire for the total tax amount due all properties 7offered at a tax sale. 8(Source: P.A. 79-451; 88-455.) 9    (35 ILCS 200/21-191 new)10    Sec. 21-191. Pilot program for acquisition of tax 11certificates in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants.12    (a) In a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 13county board may elect, by ordinance or resolution, to 14participate in a pilot program under this Section. 15    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of Section 21-190, a 16county that elects to participate in the pilot program may 17acquire, as trustee under Section 21-90, tax certificates for 18up to 100 properties offered at an annual tax sale. Those 19properties must meet the following conditions in the tax year 20for which that sale's judgment and order of sale was rendered: 21        (1) the property received a homestead exemption; and 22        (2) the total tax amount billed on the property was 23    among the 100 lowest total tax amounts billed prior to 24    adjustment by homestead exemptions. 25    (c) Not less than 30 days prior to the annual tax sale, the   HB4537 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1county shall publish on its website and deliver to the county 2clerk and county treasurer a list of the properties proposed 3for acquisition under this Section. The list shall identify 4each parcel by Permanent Index Number and commonly known 5property address, if available, and shall state that the 6parcel is proposed for acquisition under this Section. 7    (d) This Section applies to the first 6 tax sales to occur 8in a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants on or after the 9effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10Assembly.  11    (35 ILCS 200/21-192 new)12    Sec. 21-192. Pilot program report.13    (a) A county that participates in the pilot program under 14Section 21-191 shall submit an annual report to the General 15Assembly and the Department of Revenue no later than the third 16Wednesday of February of each year in which there is 17information to report under subsection (b) from the 18immediately preceding calendar year. 19    (b) Each report shall include, at a minimum: 20        (1) the number of tax certificates acquired under the 21    pilot program;22        (2) the number of tax certificates offered to the 23    private market at each annual tax sale covered by the 24    pilot program;25        (3) the number of pilot tax certificates acquired that   HB4537 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    were redeemed;2        (4) the number of pilot tax certificates for which tax 3    deeds were issued;4        (5) the number of pilot tax certificates offered at 5    tax deed auction;6        (6) the amount of surplus proceeds returned to owners 7    or other lawful claimants as result of pilot tax 8    certificates for which tax deeds were issued;9        (7) the amount remitted to taxing districts as a 10    result of redemption payments on pilot tax certificates;11        (8) the amount remitted to taxing districts as a 12    result of tax deed auctions of pilot tax certificates;13        (9) the administrative costs associated with the pilot 14    program; and15        (10) any additional information the county elects to 16    provide. 17    (c) If, in any calendar year, there is no change in the 18information described in subsection (b), then the report for 19that calendar year shall indicate that there is no change. 20Once all of the issues described in subsection (b) have been 21resolved with respect to each pilot tax certificate, the 22county shall submit a final report to the General Assembly and 23the Department of Revenue summarizing the information 24described in subsection (b).  25    (35 ILCS 200/21-205)  HB4537 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    Sec. 21-205. Tax sale procedures. 2    (a) The collector, in person or by deputy, shall attend, 3on the day and in the place specified in the notice for the tax 4sale sale of property for taxes, and shall, between 9:00 a.m. 5and 4:00 p.m., or later at the collector's discretion, proceed 6to offer for sale, separately and in consecutive order, all 7property in the list on which the taxes, special assessments, 8interest or costs have not been paid. However, in any county 9with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the offer for sale shall 10be made between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. The collector's office 11shall be kept open during all hours in which the sale is in 12progress. The tax sale shall be continued from day to day, 13until all property in the delinquent list has been offered for 14sale. However, any city, village or incorporated town 15interested in the collection of any tax or special assessment, 16may, in default of bidders, withdraw from collection the 17special assessment levied against any property by the 18corporate authorities of the city, village or incorporated 19town. In case of a withdrawal, there shall be no sale of that 20property on account of the delinquent special assessment 21thereon.22    (b) Until January 1, 2013, in every tax sale of property 23pursuant to the provisions of this Code, the collector may 24employ any automated means that the collector deems 25appropriate. Beginning on January 1, 2013, either (i) the 26collector shall employ an automated bidding system that is   HB4537 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1programmed to accept the lowest redemption price bid by an 2eligible tax purchaser, subject to the penalty percentage 3limitation set forth in Section 21-215, or (ii) all tax sales 4shall be digitally recorded with video and audio. All bidders 5are required to personally attend the tax sale and, if 6automated means are used, all hardware and software used with 7respect to those automated means must be certified by the 8Department and re-certified by the Department every 5 years. 9If the tax sales are digitally recorded and no automated 10bidding system is used, then the recordings shall be 11maintained by the collector for a period of at least 3 years 12from the date of the tax sale. The changes made by this 13amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly are declarative of 14existing law. 15    (b-5) For any annual tax sale conducted on or after the 16effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 17Assembly, each county collector in a county with 275,000 or 18more inhabitants shall adopt a single bidder rule sufficient 19to prohibit a tax purchaser from registering more than one 20related bidding entity at the tax sale. The corporate 21authorities in any county with less than 275,000 inhabitants 22may, by ordinance, allow the county collector of that county 23to adopt such a single bidder rule. In any county that has 24adopted a single bidder rule under this subsection (b-5), the 25county treasurer shall include a representation and warranty 26form in each registration package attesting to compliance with   HB4537 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1the single bidder rule, except that the county may, by 2ordinance, opt out of this representation and warranty form 3requirement. A single bidder rule under this subsection may be 4in the following form: 5        (1) A registered tax buying entity (principal) may 6    only have one registered buyer at the tax sale and may not 7    have a related bidding entity directly or indirectly 8    register as a buyer or participate in the tax sale. A 9    registered tax buying entity may not engage in any 10    multiple bidding strategy for the purpose of having more 11    than one related bidding entity submit bids at the tax 12    sale. 13        (2) A related bidding entity is defined as any 14    individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, 15    limited liability company, business organization, or other 16    entity that has a shareholder, partner, principal, 17    officer, general partner, or other person or entity having 18    (i) an ownership interest in a bidding entity in common 19    with any other registered participant in the tax sale or 20    (ii) a common guarantor in connection with a source of 21    financing with any other registered participant in the tax 22    sale. The determination of whether registered entities are 23    related so as to prohibit those entities from submitting 24    duplicate bids in violation of the single bidder rule is 25    at the sole and exclusive discretion of the county 26    treasurer or his or her designated representatives.   HB4537 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    (c) County collectors may, when applicable, eject tax 2bidders who disrupt the tax sale or use illegal bid practices. 3    (d) Any property to be acquired by a county in the manner 4described in subsections (b) or (c) of Section 21-190 shall 5not be offered for sale in the manner detailed in subsections 6(a) through (c) of this Section. Instead, all such property 7shall be sold to the county for the total amount due on the day 8of the scheduled tax sale in whatever manner is deemed most 9expedient and efficient by the collector's office. For any 10properties acquired by the county as described in subsections 11(b) or (c) of Section 21-190 that are subsequently sold at a 12tax deed auction in accordance with this Code, any amounts 13generated in cash from such tax deed auction shall be 14distributed to taxing districts in the manner described in 15subsection (c) of Section 21-90 and subsection (3) of Section 1622-42. 17(Source: P.A. 102-519, eff. 8-20-21.) 18    (35 ILCS 200/21-215)19    Sec. 21-215. Penalty bids. 20    (a) Subject to subsection (b) of this Section, the The 21person at the sale offering to pay the amount due on each 22property for the least penalty percentage shall be the 23purchaser of that property. No bid shall be accepted for a 24penalty exceeding 9% of the amount of the tax or special 25assessment on property.  HB4537 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    (b) If the county offers to purchase property for the 2amount due in accordance with subsections (b) and (c) of 3Section 21-190, the county shall be the purchaser of the 4property notwithstanding any other offer. Subject to a payment 5plan implemented by the county clerk in accordance with 6subsection (d) of Section 21-385, the penalty bid for any 7property purchased by a county in this manner shall be 0.75% 8per month. 9(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22.) 10    (35 ILCS 200/21-225)11    Sec. 21-225. Forfeited tax liens and certificates. Every 12tax lien or certificate for property offered at public tax 13sale, and not sold for want of bidders, unless it is released 14from tax sale by the withdrawal from collection of a special 15assessment levied thereon, shall be forfeited to the county, 16as trustee for the taxing districts, and managed pursuant to 17Section 21-90. Tax certificates are also forfeited to the 18county in those circumstances described in subsection (d) of 19Section 21-310 and subsection (f) of Section 22-40 of this 20Code.21(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 22    (35 ILCS 200/21-296 new)23    Sec. 21-296. Creation of surplus equity fund.24    (a) In counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, each   HB4537 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1person purchasing any property at a sale under this Code shall 2pay to the county collector, prior to the issuance of any 3certificate of purchase, a nonrefundable surplus equity fee 4set by the county collector of not more than $20 for each item 5purchased. A like sum shall be paid for each year that all or a 6portion of subsequent taxes are paid by the tax purchaser and 7posted to the tax judgment, sale, redemption and forfeiture 8record where the underlying certificate of purchase is 9recorded. 10    (a-5) In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, each 11person purchasing property at a sale under this Code shall pay 12to the county collector a nonrefundable surplus equity fee of 135% of the total taxes, interest, and penalties for each 14certificate purchased, with a maximum fee cap of $1,000, plus 15an additional sum equal to 5% of the taxes, interest, and 16penalties paid under Section 21-240. In these counties, the 17certificate holder shall also pay to the county collector a 18fee of $80 for each year that all or a portion of subsequent 19taxes are paid by the tax purchaser and posted to the tax 20judgment, sale, redemption, and forfeiture record. 21    (b) The amount paid prior to the issuance of the 22certificate of purchase under subsection (a) or (a-5) shall be 23included in the purchase price of the property in the 24certificate of purchase, and all amounts paid under this 25Section shall be included in the amount required to redeem 26under Section 21-355, except for the nonrefundable fee for   HB4537 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1each item purchased at the tax sale as provided in this 2Section. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of 3Section 21-301, all money received under subsection (a) or 4(a-5) shall be paid by the collector to the county treasurer of 5the county in which the land is situated for the purpose of a 6surplus equity fund. The county treasurer, as trustee of that 7fund, shall invest all of that fund, principal and income, in 8his or her hands from time to time, if not immediately required 9for payments of surplus equity under Section 21-302, in 10investments permitted by the Public Funds Investment Act.  11    (35 ILCS 200/21-301 new)12    Sec. 21-301. Amount to be retained in surplus equity fund.13    (a) The county board in each county shall determine the 14amount of the fund to be maintained in that county until all 15potential claims under Section 21-302 have been paid. Any 16moneys accumulated by the County Treasurer in excess of the 17amount so established, as trustee of the fund, shall be paid by 18him or her to the general fund of the County once all potential 19claims under Section 21-302 have been paid. 20    (b) In counties in which a Tort Liability Fund is 21established, all sums of money received under subsection (a) 22of Section 21-296 may be deposited into the general fund of the 23county for general county governmental purposes, if the county 24board provides by ordinance that the surplus equity required 25by this Section shall be provided by the Tort Liability Fund.    HB4537 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    (35 ILCS 200/21-302 new)2    Sec. 21-302. Payments of surplus equity.3    (a) A previous owner of property sold under any provision 4of this Code who sustains loss or damage by reason of the 5issuance of a tax deed shall have the right to recover surplus 6equity that was lost in the property through an award from a 7surplus equity fund as follows:8        (1) For tax deeds recorded in the 2 years prior to the 9    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10    Assembly, the claim for an equity award under this Section 11    shall be filed not later than 2 years after the effective 12    date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.13        (2) For outstanding tax certificates issued prior to 14    the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 15    General Assembly that result in recorded deeds after the 16    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 17    Assembly, the claim for an equity award shall be filed not 18    later than 2 years from the date of deed recording.19        (3) The equity award shall be limited to the value of 20    the property as of the date the tax deed was issued less 21    any mortgages or liens on the property.22        (4) In determining the fair cash value of property 23    less any mortgages or liens on the property, the value 24    shall be reduced by the amount of all taxes paid by the tax 25    purchaser or his or her assignee before the issuance of   HB4537 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    the tax deed, or if the tax certificate was acquired 2    pursuant to Section 21-90, the value shall be reduced by 3    the amount of all taxes included in the certificate, plus 4    the amount of subsequent, forfeited, or sold taxes 5    excluded from payment or redemption under subsection (a) 6    of Section 22-40 when the county or its agent, as trustee 7    pursuant to Section 21-90, is the tax deed petitioner. The 8    fair cash value shall also be reduced by the amount of any 9    taxes that were merged into the tax deed pursuant to 10    subsection (b) of Section 22-40. The value shall also be 11    reduced by any amount received by the petitioner as a 12    result of an auction held under Section 22-40 or 21-90. 13    The court, in its discretion, may order the joinder of the 14    mortgagee or lienholder as an additional party to the 15    surplus equity action.16    (b) The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure shall 17apply to proceedings under the petition, except that neither 18the petitioner nor the county treasurer shall be entitled to 19trial by jury on the issues presented in the petition. 20    Any person claiming surplus equity under this Section 21shall petition the court that ordered the tax deed to issue, 22shall name the county treasurer, as trustee of the surplus 23equity fund, as defendant to the petition, and shall ask that 24judgment be entered against the county treasurer, as trustee, 25in the amount of the surplus equity sought. 26    The county treasurer, as trustee of the surplus equity   HB4537 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1fund, shall be so subrogated to all parties in whose favor 2judgment may be rendered against him or her, and by third party 3complaint may bring in as a defendant any person, other than 4the tax deed grantee and its successors in title, not a party 5to the action who is or may be liable to him or her, as 6subrogee, for all or part of the petitioner's claim against 7him or her. 8    (c) Any contract involving the proceeds of a judgment for 9surplus equity under this Section, between the tax deed 10grantee or its successors in title and the surplus equity 11petitioner or his or her successors, shall be in writing. In 12any action brought under Section 21-302, the collector shall 13be entitled to discovery regarding, but not limited to, the 14following: 15        (1) the identity of all persons beneficially 16    interested in the contract, directly or indirectly, 17    including at least the following information: the names 18    and addresses of any natural persons; the place of 19    incorporation of any corporation and the names and 20    addresses of its shareholders, unless it is publicly held; 21    the names and addresses of all general and limited 22    partners of any partnership; the names and addresses of 23    all persons having an ownership interest in any entity 24    doing business under an assumed name and the county in 25    which the assumed business name is registered; and the 26    nature and extent of the interest in the contract of each   HB4537 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    person identified; 2        (2) the time period during which the contract was 3    negotiated and agreed upon, from the date of the first 4    direct or indirect contact between any of the contracting 5    parties to the date of its execution; 6        (3) the name and address of each natural person who 7    took part in negotiating the contract and the identity and 8    relationship of the party that the person represented in 9    the negotiations; and 10        (4) the existence of an agreement for payment of 11    attorney's fees by or on behalf of each party.12    Any information disclosed during discovery may be subject 13to protective order as deemed appropriate by the court. The 14terms of the contract shall not be used as evidence of value. 15    (d) No previous owner shall be entitled to an award of 16surplus equity pursuant to this Section who was awarded a 17refund of surplus equity on the same property from an auction 18held under Section 22-40 or 21-90 or who previously petitioned 19successfully for indemnity from the indemnity fund on the same 20property under Section 21-305. Any amount awarded under this 21Section shall be subject to an offset in an amount equal to the 22amount recovered in any similar filing or cause of action 23against the county. 24    (e) If the surplus equity fund does not have sufficient 25funds to cover any surplus equity award ordered pursuant to 26Section 21-302, the county shall fund the balance necessary to   HB4537 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1satisfy the unpaid surplus equity award pursuant to Section 221-302 within 12 months after the date of the court order 3awarding surplus equity.  4    (35 ILCS 200/21-305)5    Sec. 21-305. Payments from Indemnity Fund. 6    (a) Any owner of property sold under any provision of this 7Code who sustains loss or damage by reason of the issuance of a 8tax deed under Section 21-445 or 22-40 and who is barred or is 9in any way precluded from bringing an action for the recovery 10of the property shall have the right to indemnity for the loss 11or damage sustained, limited as follows: 12        (1) An owner who resided on property that contained 4 13    or less dwelling units on the last day of the period of 14    redemption and who is equitably entitled to compensation 15    for the loss or damage sustained has the right to 16    indemnity. An equitable indemnity award shall be limited 17    to the fair cash value of the property as of the date the 18    tax deed was issued less any mortgages or liens on the 19    property, and the award will not exceed $99,000. The Court 20    shall liberally construe this equitable entitlement 21    standard to provide compensation wherever, in the 22    discretion of the Court, the equities warrant the action. 23        An owner of a property that contained 4 or less 24    dwelling units who requests an award in excess of $99,000 25    must prove that the loss of his or her property was not   HB4537 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    attributable to his or her own fault or negligence before 2    an award in excess of $99,000 will be granted. 3        (2) An owner who sustains the loss or damage of any 4    property occasioned by reason of the issuance of a tax 5    deed, without fault or negligence of his or her own, has 6    the right to indemnity limited to the fair cash value of 7    the property less any mortgages or liens on the property. 8    In determining the existence of fault or negligence, the 9    court shall consider whether the owner exercised ordinary 10    reasonable diligence under all of the relevant 11    circumstances. 12        (3) In determining the fair cash value of property 13    less any mortgages or liens on the property, the fair cash 14    value shall be reduced by the principal amount of all 15    taxes paid by the tax purchaser or his or her assignee 16    before the issuance of the tax deed, or if the tax 17    certificate was acquired pursuant to Section 21-90, the 18    fair cash value shall be reduced by the principal amount 19    of all taxes for the tax years included in the 20    certificate, plus the principal amount of subsequent, 21    forfeited, or sold taxes excluded from the payment or 22    redemption requirement of Section 22-40(a) when the county 23    or its agent is the tax deed petitioner. 24        (4) If an award made under paragraph (1) or (2) is 25    subject to a reduction by the amount of an outstanding 26    mortgage or lien on the property, other than the principal   HB4537 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    amount of all taxes paid by the tax purchaser or his or her 2    assignee before the issuance of the tax deed and the 3    petitioner would be personally liable to the mortgagee or 4    lienholder for all or part of that reduction amount, the 5    court shall order an additional indemnity award to be paid 6    directly to the mortgagee or lienholder sufficient to 7    discharge the petitioner's personal liability. The court, 8    in its discretion, may order the joinder of the mortgagee 9    or lienholder as an additional party to the indemnity 10    action.11    (b) Indemnity fund; subrogation. 12        (1) Any person claiming indemnity hereunder shall 13    petition the Court which ordered the tax deed to issue, 14    shall name the County Treasurer, as Trustee of the 15    indemnity fund, as defendant to the petition, and shall 16    ask that judgment be entered against the County Treasurer, 17    as Trustee, in the amount of the indemnity sought. The 18    provisions of the Civil Practice Law shall apply to 19    proceedings under the petition, except that neither the 20    petitioner nor County Treasurer shall be entitled to trial 21    by jury on the issues presented in the petition. The Court 22    shall liberally construe this Section to provide 23    compensation wherever in the discretion of the Court the 24    equities warrant such action. 25        (2) The County Treasurer, as Trustee of the indemnity 26    fund, shall be subrogated to all parties in whose favor   HB4537 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    judgment may be rendered against him or her, and by third 2    party complaint may bring in as a defendant any person, 3    other than the tax deed grantee and its successors in 4    title, not a party to the action who is or may be liable to 5    him or her, as subrogee, for all or part of the 6    petitioner's claim against him or her.7    (c) Any contract involving the proceeds of a judgment for 8indemnity under this Section, between the tax deed grantee or 9its successors in title and the indemnity petitioner or his or 10her successors, shall be in writing. In any action brought 11under Section 21-305, the Collector shall be entitled to 12discovery regarding, but not limited to, the following: 13        (1) the identity of all persons beneficially 14    interested in the contract, directly or indirectly, 15    including at least the following information: the names 16    and addresses of any natural persons; the place of 17    incorporation of any corporation and the names and 18    addresses of its shareholders unless it is publicly held; 19    the names and addresses of all general and limited 20    partners of any partnership; the names and addresses of 21    all persons having an ownership interest in any entity 22    doing business under an assumed name, and the county in 23    which the assumed business name is registered; and the 24    nature and extent of the interest in the contract of each 25    person identified; 26        (2) the time period during which the contract was   HB4537 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    negotiated and agreed upon, from the date of the first 2    direct or indirect contact between any of the contracting 3    parties to the date of its execution; 4        (3) the name and address of each natural person who 5    took part in negotiating the contract, and the identity 6    and relationship of the party that the person represented 7    in the negotiations; and 8        (4) the existence of an agreement for payment of 9    attorney's fees by or on behalf of each party.10    Any information disclosed during discovery may be subject 11to protective order as deemed appropriate by the court. The 12terms of the contract shall not be used as evidence of value.13    (d) A petition of indemnity under this Section must be 14filed within 10 years after the date the tax deed was issued. 15    (e) No previous owner shall be entitled to an award of 16indemnity pursuant to this Section 21-305 who was awarded a 17refund of surplus equity from an auction held under Section 1822-40 or 21-90 or who was previously awarded a refund from the 19surplus equity fund under Section 21-302. 20(Source: P.A. 97-557, eff. 7-1-12.) 21    (35 ILCS 200/21-310)22    Sec. 21-310. Sales in error. 23    (a) When, upon application of the county collector, the 24owner of the certificate of purchase, the holder of a 5% lien 25issued pursuant to Section 21-240, or a municipality which   HB4537 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1owns or has owned the property ordered sold, it appears to the 2satisfaction of the court which ordered the property sold that 3any of the following subsections are applicable, the court 4shall declare the sale to be a sale in error:5        (1) the property was not subject to taxation, or all 6    or any part of the lien of taxes sold has become null and 7    void pursuant to Section 21-95 or unenforceable pursuant 8    to subsection (c) of Section 18-250 or subsection (b) of 9    Section 22-40;10        (2) the taxes or special assessments had been paid 11    prior to the sale of the property;12        (3) there is a double assessment;13        (4) the description is void for uncertainty;14        (5) the assessor, chief county assessment officer, 15    board of review, board of appeals, or other county 16    official has made an error material to the tax certificate 17    at issue (other than an error of judgment as to the value 18    of any property), provided, however, that a sale in error 19    may not be declared upon application of the owner of the 20    certificate of purchase under this paragraph (5) if the 21    county collector provided notice in accordance with 22    Section 21-118 that the same property received a previous 23    sale in error on the same facts; 24        (5.5) the owner of the homestead property had tendered 25    timely and full payment to the county collector that the 26    owner reasonably believed was due and owing on the   HB4537 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    homestead property, and the county collector did not apply 2    the payment to the homestead property; provided that this 3    provision applies only to homeowners, not their agents or 4    third-party payors;5        (6) a voluntary or involuntary petition was filed by 6    or against the legal or beneficial owner of the property 7    requesting relief under the provisions of 11 U.S.C. 8    Chapter 7, 11, 12, or 13, and the bankruptcy case was open 9    on the date the collector's application for judgment was 10    filed pursuant to Section 21-150 or 21-155 or the date of 11    the tax sale; 12        (7) the property is owned by the United States, the 13    State of Illinois, a municipality, or a taxing district; 14    or15        (8) the owner of the property is a reservist or 16    guardsperson who is granted an extension of his or her due 17    date under Sections 21-15, 21-20, and 21-25 of this Act. 18    (b) When, upon application of the owner of the certificate 19of purchase only, it appears to the satisfaction of the court 20which ordered the property sold that any of the following 21subsections are applicable, the court shall declare the sale 22to be a sale in error:23        (1) A voluntary or involuntary petition under the 24    provisions of 11 U.S.C. Chapter 7, 11, 12, or 13 has been 25    filed subsequent to the tax sale and prior to the issuance 26    of the tax deed, and the bankruptcy case was open on the   HB4537 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    date the petition for a sale in error was filed.2        (2) The improvements upon the property sold have been 3    substantially destroyed subsequent to the tax sale and 4    prior to the issuance of the tax deed; however, if the 5    court declares a sale in error under this paragraph (2), 6    the court may order the holder of the certificate of 7    purchase to assign the certificate to the county collector 8    if requested by the county collector. The county collector 9    may, upon request of the county, as trustee, or upon 10    request of a taxing district having an interest in the 11    taxes sold, further assign any certificate of purchase 12    received pursuant to this paragraph (2) to the county 13    acting as trustee for taxing districts pursuant to Section 14    21-90 of this Code or to the taxing district having an 15    interest in the taxes sold. 16        (3) There is an interest held by the United States in 17    the property sold which could not be extinguished by the 18    tax deed.19        (4) The real property contains a hazardous substance, 20    hazardous waste, or underground storage tank that would 21    require cleanup or other removal under any federal, State, 22    or local law, ordinance, or regulation, only if the tax 23    purchaser purchased the property without actual knowledge 24    of the hazardous substance, hazardous waste, or 25    underground storage tank. The presence of a grease trap on 26    the property is not grounds for a sale in error under this   HB4537 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    paragraph (4). This paragraph (4) applies only if the 2    owner of the certificate of purchase has made application 3    for a sale in error at any time before the issuance of a 4    tax deed. If the court declares a sale in error under this 5    paragraph (4), the court may order the holder of the 6    certificate of purchase to assign the certificate to the 7    county collector if requested by the county collector. The 8    county collector may, upon request of the county, as 9    trustee, or upon request of a taxing district having an 10    interest in the taxes sold, further assign any certificate 11    of purchase received pursuant to this paragraph (4) to the 12    county acting as trustee for taxing districts pursuant to 13    Section 21-90 of this Code or to the taxing district 14    having an interest in the taxes sold. 15        (5) The certificate of purchase was issued prior to 16    the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 17    General Assembly, the certificate's redemption period has 18    expired, and the certificate has not been deeded, 19    redeemed, vacated, or voided under Section 22-85. 20    Whenever a court declares a sale in error under this 21subsection (b), the State's attorney shall promptly notify the 22county collector in writing. 23    (c) When the county collector discovers, prior to the 24expiration of the period of redemption, that a tax sale should 25not have occurred for one or more of the reasons set forth in 26subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5.5), (a)(6),   HB4537 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1(a)(7), or (a)(8) of this Section, the county collector shall 2notify the last known owner of the tax certificate by 3certified and regular mail, or other means reasonably 4calculated to provide actual notice, that the county collector 5intends to declare an administrative sale in error and of the 6reasons therefor, including documentation sufficient to 7establish the reason why the sale should not have occurred. 8The owner of the certificate of purchase may object in writing 9within 28 days after the date of the mailing by the county 10collector. If an objection is filed, the county collector 11shall not administratively declare a sale in error, but may 12apply to the circuit court for a sale in error as provided in 13subsection (a) of this Section. Thirty days following the 14receipt of notice by the last known owner of the certificate of 15purchase, or within a reasonable time thereafter, the county 16collector shall make a written declaration, based upon clear 17and convincing evidence, that the taxes were sold in error and 18shall deliver a copy thereof to the county clerk within 30 days 19after the date the declaration is made for entry in the tax 20judgment, sale, redemption, and forfeiture record pursuant to 21subsection (d) of this Section. The county collector shall 22promptly notify the last known owner of the certificate of 23purchase of the declaration by regular mail and shall, except 24if the certificate was issued pursuant to a no-cash bid, 25promptly pay the amount of the tax sale, together with 26interest and costs as provided in Section 21-315, upon   HB4537 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1surrender of the original certificate of purchase.2    (c-5) When the holder of the certificate of purchase is 3the county as trustee for taxing districts, upon request of or 4consent by the county as trustee, or its agent, if the county 5collector agrees, prior to the issuance of a tax deed, that a 6tax sale should not have occurred for one or more of the 7reasons set forth in subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3), 8(a)(4), (a)(5.5), (a)(6), (a)(7), (a)(8), or (b)(1) of this 9Section, or, with the consent of the chief county assessment 10officer, subdivision (a)(5), the county collector may declare 11an administrative sale in error. Such declaration shall be a 12written declaration, based on clear and convincing evidence, 13that the taxes were sold in error and the county collector 14shall deliver a copy thereto to the county clerk within 30 days 15after the date the declaration is made for entry in the tax 16judgment, sale, redemption, and forfeiture record. 17    (d) If a sale is declared to be a sale in error for any 18reason set forth in Section 22-35, Section 22-50, or 19subdivision (a)(5), (b)(2), or (b)(4) of this Section, the tax 20certificate shall be forfeited to the county as trustee 21pursuant to Section 21-90 of this Code, unless the county 22collector informs the county and the county clerk in writing 23that the tax certificate shall not be forfeited to the county 24as trustee. The county clerk shall make entry in the tax 25judgment, sale, redemption and forfeiture record, that the 26property was erroneously sold and that the tax certificate is   HB4537 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1forfeited to the county pursuant to Section 21-90, and the 2county collector shall, on demand of the owner of the 3certificate of purchase, refund the amount paid, except for 4the nonrefundable $80 fee paid, pursuant to Section 21-295, 5for each item purchased at the tax sale, pay any interest and 6costs as may be ordered under Sections 21-315 through 21-335, 7and cancel the certificate so far as it relates to the 8property. The county collector shall deduct from the accounts 9of the appropriate taxing bodies their pro rata amounts paid. 10    (e) Whenever the collector declares an administrative sale 11in error under this Section, the collector must send a copy of 12the declaration of the administrative sale in error, and 13documentation sufficient to establish the reason why the sale 14should not have occurred, to the government entity responsible 15for maintaining assessment books and property record cards for 16the subject property. That entity must review the 17documentation sent by the collector, make a determination as 18to whether an update to the assessment books or property 19record cards is necessary to prevent a recurrence of the sale 20in error, and update the assessment books or property record 21cards as appropriate. 22    (f) Whenever a court declares a sale in error under this 23Section, the State's attorney must send a copy of the 24application and order declaring the sale in error to the 25county collector, the county clerk, and the government entity 26responsible for maintaining the assessment books and property   HB4537 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1record cards for the subject property. The collector, the 2county clerk, and the other government entity must each review 3the application and order sent by the State's attorney and 4make a determination as to whether an update to its respective 5records is necessary to prevent a recurrence of the sale in 6error, and update its records as appropriate. 7    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 8the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 9certificates issued on or after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 11(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 12    (35 ILCS 200/21-350)13    Sec. 21-350. Period of redemption. Property sold at a tax 14sale under this Code may be redeemed at any time before the 15expiration of 3 2.5 years from the date of sale, except that:16        (a) If on the date of sale the property is vacant 17    non-farm property or property containing an improvement 18    consisting of a structure or structures with 7 or more 19    residential units or that is commercial or industrial 20    property, it may be redeemed at any time before the 21    expiration of 1 year from the date of the tax sale.22        (b) (Blank).23        (c) (Blank). If the period of redemption has been 24    extended by the certificate holder as provided in Section 25    21-385 or Section 22-5, the property may be redeemed on or   HB4537 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    before the extended redemption date. The changes made to 2    this Section by this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 3    Assembly apply to matters concerning tax certificates 4    issued on or after January 1, 2024. 5    The changes made to this Section by Public Act 103-555 6apply to matters concerning tax certificates issued on or 7after January 1, 2024. The changes made to this Section by this 8amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly apply to matters 9concerning tax certificates issued on or after the effective 10date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 11(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 12    (35 ILCS 200/22-5)13    Sec. 22-5. Notice of sale and redemption rights. In order 14to be entitled to an order for a judicial tax deed auction and 15a tax deed, within 4 months and 15 days after any tax sale held 16under this Code, the purchaser or his or her assignee, and the 17county for all tax liens or certificates it acquires pursuant 18to Section 21-90 of this Code forfeited certificates from the 19annual sale, shall deliver to the county clerk a notice to be 20given to the party in whose name the taxes are last assessed as 21shown by the most recent tax collector's warrant books, in at 22least 10 point type in the following form completely filled 23in:24TAKE NOTICE25    County of ...........................................  HB4537 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    Date Premises Sold or Forfeited .....................2    Certificate No. .....................................3    Sold for General Taxes of (year) ....................4    Sold for Special Assessment of (Municipality)5    and special assessment number .......................6    Warrant No. ............... Inst. No. .................7THIS PROPERTY HAS BEEN SOLD AT A TAX SALE FOR8DELINQUENT TAXES9Property Address (as identified on the most recent tax bill, 10if available) ....11Legal Description or Property Index No. ..........12..........13..............................14    This notice is to advise you that if you do not redeem by 15paying your tax debt before the deadline, a petition may be 16filed in court that for a tax deed which will transfer title 17and the right to possession of the above-referenced property 18("Property"). If you are a homeowner, this may eventually 19result in eviction from your home if redemption is not made on 20or before the redemption deadline. 21Your right to redeem will expire on .......... 22    To request determine the redemption deadline and the total 23amount you must pay to redeem the sold taxes, you must 24immediately contact the County Clerk at the address, phone 25number, or email address below. Check with the County Clerk 26for the exact amount you owe before redeeming. Payment must be   HB4537 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1made by certified check, cashier's check, money order, or in 2cash to the County Clerk. 3YOU ARE URGED TO REDEEM IMMEDIATELY TO4PREVENT LOSS OF PROPERTY AND ADDITIONAL COSTS 5    The longer you wait, the more expensive it will be to 6redeem and prevent the loss of your property. Interest will 7continue to accrue on the total amount owed until the property 8is redeemed, and you may owe additional attorney or filing 9fees if the certificate holder chooses to pursue an order for a 10tax deed auction to compel the sale or transfer of the deed to 11the property. 12    Property sold under the Property Tax Code may be redeemed 13by any owner or person holding an interest in the Property at 14any time before the following deadlines (based on property 15classification as of the Date of Sale): 16    You must redeem your taxes within one year of the Date of 17Sale for the following classifications: 18        (1) vacant non-farm property;19        (2) property containing an improvement consisting of a 20    structure or structures with 7 or more residential units; 21    and22        (3) commercial or industrial property. 23    You must redeem your taxes within 2 1/2 years of the Date 24of Sale for the following classifications: 25        (1) all residential property with less than 6 units; 26    and  HB4537 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1        (2) all other property not covered by the 1-year 2    redemption period outlined above. 3    Redemption deadlines may have been extended by the 4certificate holder or pursuant to Illinois law. 5    To confirm the amount you will need to redeem redemption 6deadline, you must contact the County Clerk at the address, 7telephone number, or email address below. Redemption can be 8made at any time on or before .... by applying to the County 9Clerk of .... County, Illinois at the Office of the County 10Clerk in ...., Illinois. The address, telephone number, and 11email address for the County Clerk is as follows: 12ADDRESS:............................ 13TELEPHONE AND/OR EMAIL ADDRESS:.......................... 14    For further information about the redemption deadline, 15redemption amount, or payment process, please contact the 16County Clerk. 17    Contact the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban 18Development (HUD) to find local housing counselors in your 19area.   20    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 21redemption notice shall contain a provision in Spanish, 22Polish, and Mandarin Chinese, stating that the redemption 23notice affects important legal rights and should be translated 24immediately. In counties with fewer than 3,000,000   HB4537 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1inhabitants, the redemption notice may include a notice in one 2or more foreign languages stating that the redemption notice 3affects important legal rights and should be translated 4immediately. 5    Within 10 days after receipt of said notice, the county 6clerk shall mail to the addresses supplied by the purchaser or 7assignee, by registered or certified mail, copies of said 8notice to the party in whose name the taxes are last assessed 9as shown by the most recent tax collector's warrant books. 10With the exception of a county or taxing district acquiring 11certificates pursuant to Section 21-90 and 21-260, all 12purchasers or assignees shall pay to the clerk postage plus 13the sum of $10. The clerk shall write or stamp the date of 14receiving the notices upon the copies of the notices, and 15retain one copy.16    All With the exception of forfeited tax liens or 17certificates held by the county pursuant to Section 21-90, all 18redemption periods shall begin on the date of the tax sale. For 19forfeited tax liens or certificates held by the county 20pursuant to Section 21-90, the county may cure any defect in a 21notice, or failure to send a notice as required by this 22Section, by delivering to the county clerk a notice to be given 23to the party in whose name the taxes are last assessed as shown 24by the most recent tax collector's warrant books. The 25redemption period begins on the date the county delivered the 26corrected notice to the clerk, if such extension is otherwise   HB4537 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1permitted by law. 2    The changes to this Section made by this amendatory Act of 3the 97th General Assembly apply only to tax sales that occur on 4or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th 5General Assembly.6    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 7the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 8certificates issued on or after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 10(Source: P.A. 102-815, eff. 5-13-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 11    (35 ILCS 200/22-10)12    Sec. 22-10. Notice of expiration of period of redemption. 13A purchaser or assignee shall not be entitled to request an 14order for a judicial tax deed auction and a tax deed to the 15property sold at an annual tax sale unless, not less than 3 16months nor more than 6 months prior to the expiration of the 17period of redemption, he or she gives notice of the sale and 18the date of expiration of the period of redemption to the 19owners, occupants, the municipality in which the subject 20property lies or county if the property lies outside municipal 21corporate boundaries, and interested parties interested in the 22property, including any mortgagee of record, as provided 23below. For counties or taxing districts holding certificates 24pursuant to Section 21-90, the date of expiration of the 25period of redemption shall be designated by the county or   HB4537 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1taxing district in its petition for tax deed and identified in 2the notice below, which shall be filed with the county clerk.3    The Notice to be given to the parties shall be in at least 410-point type in the following form completely filled in:5TAX DEED NO. .................... FILED ....................6TAKE NOTICE7    County of ...........................................8    Date Premises Sold or Forfeited .....................9    Certificate No. .....................................10    Sold or Forfeited for General Taxes of (year) .......11    Sold for Special Assessment of (Municipality)12    and special assessment number .......................13    Warrant No. ................ Inst. No. .................14THIS PROPERTY HAS BEEN SOLD AT A TAX SALE FOR15DELINQUENT TAXES16Property Address (as identified on the most recent tax bill, 17if available) ....18Legal Description or Property Index No. ..........19..........20..............................21    This notice is to advise you that the above property has 22been sold for delinquent taxes at a tax sale and that the 23period of redemption from the sale will expire on ......24......25    Check with the county clerk as to the exact amount you owe 26before redeeming.  HB4537 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    This notice is also to advise you that a petition has been 2filed in the Circuit Court seeking an order for judicial tax 3deed auction and for a tax deed which will transfer title and 4the right to possession of this property if redemption is not 5made on or before .......................................6    If you are a homeowner, this may eventually result in 7eviction from your home. This matter is set for hearing in the 8Circuit Court of this county in ...., Illinois on .....9    You may be present at this hearing but your right to redeem 10will already have expired at that time.11    You may respond to the petition or go to the hearing to 12speak to the court. But if you do not pay the overdue taxes by 13the hearing and if the court determines that all the rules were 14followed, you will lose your right to pay and keep the 15property. The property will then be offered at a public 16auction. If you are the owner, you may get any extra money left 17after the taxes and fees are paid. If there is extra money, you 18will get a notice telling you how to claim it. 19YOU ARE URGED TO REDEEM IMMEDIATELY20TO PREVENT LOSS OF PROPERTY AND ADDITIONAL COSTS 21    Redemption can be made at any time on or before .... by 22applying to the County Clerk of ...., County, Illinois at the 23Office of the County Clerk in ...., Illinois.24    For further information contact the County Clerk25ADDRESS:.................... 26TELEPHONE AND/OR EMAIL ADDRESS:..................    HB4537 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1..........................2Purchaser or Assignee. 3Dated (insert date). 4    Contact the United States Department of Housing and Urban 5Development (HUD) to find local housing counselors.  6    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the notice 7shall contain a provision in the Spanish, Polish, and Mandarin 8Chinese, stating that the notice affects important legal 9rights and should be translated immediately. Parcels that are 10either contiguous or have common ownership may be combined in 11a single notice prepared pursuant to Sections 22-10 and 22-25. 12In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the notice 13shall also state the address, room number, and time at which 14the matter is set for hearing. In counties with fewer than 153,000,000 inhabitants, the notice may include a notice in one 16or more foreign languages, stating that the notice affects 17important legal rights and should be translated immediately. 18    The changes to this Section made by Public Act 97-557 19apply only to matters in which a petition for tax deed is filed 20on or after July 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 2197-557). 22    The changes to this Section made by Public Act 102-1003 23apply to matters in which a petition for tax deed is filed on 24or after May 27, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act   HB4537 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1102-1003). Failure of any party or any public official to 2comply with the changes made to this Section by Public Act 3102-528 does not invalidate any tax deed issued prior to May 427, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1003). 5    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 6the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 7certificates issued on or after the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 9(Source: P.A. 102-528, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 10102-1003, eff. 5-27-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-555, eff. 111-1-24.) 12    (35 ILCS 200/22-40)13    Sec. 22-40. Issuance of order authorizing judicial tax 14deed auction, confirmation and order for tax deed; possession. 15    (a) To obtain an order authorizing a judicial tax deed 16auction and for issuance of tax deed, the petitioner must 17provide sufficient evidence that:18        (1) the redemption period has expired and the property 19    has not been redeemed; 20        (2) all taxes and special assessments which became due 21    and payable subsequent to the sale have been paid, unless 22    the county or its agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 23    21-90, is the petitioner; 24        (3) all forfeitures and sales which occur subsequent 25    to the sale are paid or redeemed, unless the county or its   HB4537 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 21-90, is the 2    petitioner; 3        (4) the notices required by law have been given, and 4    all advancements of public funds under the police power 5    made by a county, city, village, or town under Section 6    22-35 have been paid; and 7        (5) the petitioner has complied with all the 8    provisions of law entitling him or her to a deed. 9    Upon receipt of sufficient evidence of the requirements 10under this subsection (a), the court shall find that the 11petitioner complied with those requirements and shall enter an 12order authorizing a judicial tax deed auction or an order 13authorizing the issuance of a tax deed to a county trustee 14pursuant to Section 21-90, subject to the requirements of this 15Section, or subject to the requirements in Section 21-90 16directing the county clerk, on the production of the tax 17certificate and a certified copy of the order, to issue to the 18purchaser or its assignee a tax deed. The court shall insist on 19strict compliance with Sections Section 22-10 through 22-25. 20Prior to the entry of an order under this Section directing the 21issuance of a tax deed, the petitioner shall furnish the court 22with a report of proceedings of the evidence received on the 23application for tax deed. The petitioner shall also furnish to 24the court a statement of redemption from the county clerk 25showing the total taxes, penalties, and costs that were 26required to be paid to redeem the tax sale as specified in the   HB4537 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1notice required under Section 22-10. The petitioner for tax 2deed must file a statement of, if applicable, (i) all taxes it 3has paid or redeemed for the property, (ii) the costs paid for 4court reporter and transcript services in counties of 53,000,000 or more inhabitants, or in counties with less than 63,000,000 inhabitants, a submission of a report of proceedings 7to the court, (iii) the fees paid to the clerk for the estimate 8of redemption, (iv) all payments made for municipal 9advancements required by Section 22-35, and (v) costs incurred 10pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 21-90. The total of the 11amount shown on the statement of redemption plus items (i) 12through (v) above, or portion thereof, plus a fee not to exceed 1350% of the then-allowable foreclosure attorney fees for 14Illinois as published by Fannie Mae, plus the cost of 15publication of the judicial tax deed auction shall be 16identified as the tax deed judgment amount. The tax deed 17judgment amount shall accrue interest at 0.75% per month, or 18portion thereof, from the date of the judgment until the date 19of judicial tax deed auction. If the judicial tax deed auction 20is not concluded within 120 days after the date of the 21judgment, the judgment shall accrue interest after the 120-day 22period only if any delay in concluding the auction is the 23result of legal action taken by the owner or other interested 24party before issuance of the tax deed. The order for judicial 25tax deed auction shall include such terms and conditions of 26the auction as specified by the court and the report of   HB4537 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1proceedings shall be filed and made a part of the court record.2    (b) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Section, 3if taxes for years prior to the year or years sold are or 4become delinquent subsequent to the date of sale, the court 5shall find that the lien of those delinquent taxes has been or 6will be merged into the tax deed grantee's title if the court 7determines that the tax deed grantee or any prior holder of the 8certificate of purchase, or any person or entity under common 9ownership or control with any such grantee or prior holder of 10the certificate of purchase, was at no time the holder of any 11certificate of purchase for the years sought to be merged. If 12delinquent taxes are merged into the tax deed pursuant to this 13subsection, the court shall enter an order declaring which 14specific taxes have been or will be merged into the tax deed 15title and directing the county treasurer and county clerk to 16reflect that declaration in the warrant and judgment records; 17provided, that no such order shall be effective until a tax 18deed has been issued and timely recorded. Nothing contained in 19this Section shall relieve any owner liable for delinquent 20property taxes under this Code from the payment of the taxes 21that have been merged into the title upon issuance of the tax 22deed.23    (c) The county clerk is entitled to a fee of $10 in 24counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $5 in counties 25with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants for the issuance of the 26tax deed, with the exception of deeds issued to the county   HB4537 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1pursuant to its authority under Section 21-90. The clerk may 2not include in a tax deed more than one property as listed, 3assessed and sold in one description, except in cases where 4several properties are owned by one person. The fee paid to the 5county clerk for the issuance of the tax deed shall be 6accompanied by a $1,000 surplus equity fund fee in counties of 73,000,000 or more inhabitants and a $500 surplus equity fund 8fee in counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, with the 9exception of deeds issued to the county pursuant to its 10authority under Section 21-90. All fees received under this 11subsection shall be paid by the county clerk to the county 12treasurer of the county in which the land is situated for the 13purpose of funding the county's surplus equity fund 14established under Section 21-296. The surplus equity fund fee 15shall not be imposed once all claims on the county's surplus 16equity fund have been paid, as determined by the county 17treasurer as trustee of the fund. 18    Upon application, the court shall enter an order to place 19the tax deed grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in 20possession of the property and may enter orders and grant 21relief as may be necessary or desirable to maintain the 22grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in possession.23    (d) The court shall retain jurisdiction to enter orders 24pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Section. Public 25Act 92-223 and Public Act 95-477 shall be construed as being 26declarative of existing law and not as a new enactment.  HB4537 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    (e) Prior to the issuance of any order for judicial tax 2deed auction under this Section, the petitioner must redeem 3all taxes and special assessments on the property that are 4delinquent after the date of its tax sale subject to a pending 5tax petition filed by a county or its assignee pursuant to 6Section 21-90.7    (e-5) Following the expiration of the period of 8redemption, the petitioner's payment of (i) any subsequent tax 9and special assessment and (ii) any redemption of any sale of 10subsequent taxes or forfeiture shall be accompanied by a 11surplus equity fund fee of 10% of the principal taxes and 12interest paid by the petitioner under this section. All fees 13received under this subsection shall be paid by the collector 14and county clerk to the county treasurer of the county in which 15the land is situated for the purpose of funding the county's 16surplus equity fund established by Section 21-296. Fees 17incurred under this subsection are not refundable and they 18shall not be posted to the subject tax sale pursuant to Section 1921-355. 20    (f) If, for any reason, a purchaser fails to obtain an 21order for judicial tax deed auction or for tax deed within the 22required time period and no sale in error was granted or 23redemption paid, then the certificate shall be forfeited to 24the county, as trustee, pursuant to Section 21-90. 25    (g) Except as provided in Section 21-90, upon entry of an 26order requiring a judicial tax deed auction under subsection   HB4537 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1(a) of this Section, the property shall be offered for sale by 2public auction within 120 days after date of the order and sold 3to the highest bidder at such an auction in accordance with the 4Section 22-42 and subject to additional requirements set by 5the court's order. 6    (h) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 7Act of the 104th General Assembly apply to matters concerning 8tax certificates issued on or after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 10(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 11    (35 ILCS 200/22-42 new)12    Sec. 22-42. Judicial tax deed auction and procedures.13    (a) Notice of tax deed auction. The sheriff, or duly 14appointed private selling officer, shall give notice of the 15auction with the following information:16        (1) the Property Identification Number and Address 17    listed on the most recent tax bill;18        (2) the time and place of the auction including: 19    whether the auction will take place online, in person, or 20    both; and the website where the online bidding may take 21    place, if applicable;22        (3) the terms of the auction; and23        (4) the amount of the tax deed judgment amount 24    provided in Section 22-40.25    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the Notice   HB4537 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1of Tax Deed Auction shall be in clear and concise language, 2together with a notice in Spanish, Polish, and Mandarin 3Chinese, stating that the notice affects important legal 4rights and should be translated immediately. In counties with 5fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the Notice of Tax Deed 6Auction shall be in clear and concise language, and may 7include a notice in one or more foreign languages, stating 8that the notice of tax deed auction affects important legal 9rights and should be translated immediately. The Notice of Tax 10Deed Auction shall be mailed via first class mail to all 11interested parties, and via first class mail and certified 12mail to the owner of the property, at the address at which 13service of the Section 22-10 Take Notice was attempted and to 14any parties who have appeared in the proceeding. The notice 15shall include a sworn certificate of service signed by the 16party sending the notice attesting to the fact that the notice 17of auction was placed in the mail at least 10 calendar days 18prior to the date of the auction.19    The Notice of Tax Deed Auction shall be published at least 203 consecutive calendar weeks (Sunday through Saturday), once 21in each week, the first such notice to be published not more 22than 45 days prior to the auction, the last such notice to be 23published not less than 7 days prior to the auction. If the 24property is located in a municipality in a county with less 25than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the purchaser or his or her 26assignee shall also publish a notice as to the owner or   HB4537 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1interested party, in some newspaper published in the 2municipality, and such other publications as may be further 3ordered by the court. If the petitioner cannot identify a 4newspaper published in the municipality, or if the property is 5located in a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 6notice shall be published in a newspaper published within the 7county, and such other publications as may be further ordered 8by the court. If no newspaper is published in the county, then 9the notice shall be published in the newspaper that is 10published nearest the county seat of the county in which the 11property is located and such other publications as may be 12further ordered by the court. The publication shall include 13all information included in the notice sent pursuant to this 14Section.15    (b) Minimum bid. The selling officer shall start all 16bidding with a minimum bid equal to (1) the tax deed judgment 17amount plus interest at the rate of 0.75% per month, or portion 18thereof, for each month since the date of judgment, except as 19provided in Section 22-40, (2) the cost for the publication of 20the judicial sale required in this Section, and (3) the costs 21of the selling officer. The selling officer shall proceed to a 22public tax deed auction, offer the real estate for sale, and 23sell the real estate to the highest bidder. If no bidder is 24willing to pay the minimum bid, the petitioner shall be the 25winning bidder and entitled to a tax deed, and it shall be 26conclusively presumed that there is no surplus equity in the   HB4537 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1property.2    (c) Credit bid for petitioner. At the auction under this 3Section, the person conducting the auction shall enter a bid 4in favor of the petitioner in the amount of the minimum bid set 5forth above. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 6prevent the petitioner from bidding at the public auction. 7However, if the petitioner is the winning bidder, the holder 8must pay cash for the difference between the winning bid and 9the minimum bid, plus any applicable costs or fees that may be 10attached to the winning bid.11    (d) Receipt upon judicial tax deed auction. Upon and at 12the conclusion of the judicial tax deed auction, the person 13conducting the auction shall give to the purchaser a receipt 14of sale. The receipt shall describe the real estate purchased 15and shall show the amount bid, the total amount paid to date, 16and the amount still to be paid therefor. An additional 17receipt shall be given at the time of each subsequent payment. 18Any purchaser who fails to complete the sale for failure to 19make full payment shall forfeit to the county surplus equity 20fund any deposit already made, and the court shall order a new 21auction of the property.22    (e) Certificate of tax deed auction. Upon payment in full 23of the amount bid, the sheriff or duly appointed selling 24officer conducting the sale shall issue, in duplicate, and 25give to the purchaser a certificate of judicial tax deed 26auction. The certificate of judicial tax deed auction shall be   HB4537 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1in a recordable form, describe the real estate purchased, 2indicate the date and place of sale and show the amount paid 3therefor. The certificate of tax deed sale shall further 4indicate that it is subject to confirmation by the court. The 5certificate of sale shall be freely assignable by endorsement 6thereon.7    (f) Deposit of surplus funds. To the extent that the 8winning bid exceeds the minimum bid, upon the expiration of 30 9days following confirmation of the sale, the selling officer 10shall deposit the surplus funds with the treasurer of the 11county in which the subject property lies and provide the 12treasurer with the parties and mailing addresses to which all 13Take Notices were sent pursuant to Section 22-10. The 14treasurer shall send a notice to all parties sent the Section 1522-10 Take Notice, stating that the owner at the time of the 16sale is entitled to a distribution of surplus proceeds and may 17file a claim to recover the surplus with the treasurer of the 18county.19    (g) Confirmation of sale; Order for issuance of tax deed.20        (1) The sheriff or selling officer conducting the sale 21    shall promptly make a report to the court that issued the 22    order authorizing the judicial tax deed auction, which 23    report shall include a copy of all receipts and, if any, 24    certificate of judicial tax deed sale.25        (2) Upon motion and notice in accordance with court 26    rules applicable to motions generally, which motion shall   HB4537 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    not be made prior to sale, the court shall conduct a 2    hearing to confirm the sale. Unless the court finds that a 3    notice required in this Section was not issued or the sale 4    was not conducted in accordance with the order for 5    judicial tax deed auction, the court shall enter an order 6    (a) confirming the judicial tax deed auction sale, (b) 7    directing the county clerk to issue a tax deed in the name 8    of the holder of the certificate of judicial tax deed 9    auction sale once presented with a certified copy of the 10    confirmation order and original certificate of judicial 11    tax deed auction sale, and (c) directing the selling 12    officer to pay to the holder of the tax certificate the 13    amount of the credit bid upon surrender of the tax 14    certificate, and to pay the selling officer its fees. The 15    order for issuance of tax deed shall contain the name, 16    address, and telephone number of the holder of the 17    certificate of judicial tax deed auction sale for the 18    clerk to confirm the identity of the tax deed grantee.19        (3) Unless the tax certificate was forfeited to the 20    county in the manner described in Section 21-225 of this 21    Code, if the county is the holder of the tax certificate 22    for property sold at a judicial tax deed auction in 23    accordance with this Section, any proceeds of any such 24    sale shall be distributed to the taxing districts in 25    proportion to their respective interests therein. 26    Notwithstanding the preceding, any distribution to the   HB4537 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    taxing districts shall be reduced by the following: all 2    costs incurred by either the county, the court, or the 3    selling officer associated with the sale of the property. 4    Any surplus amount to be held by the county treasurer and 5    distributed to former owners in accordance with paragraph 6    (5) of this Section shall be excluded from distributions 7    to taxing districts.8        (4) If any tax deed auction sale fails to comply with 9    the requirements in this Section, any party may, by motion 10    supported by affidavit made prior to confirmation of such 11    sale, request that the court which entered the judgment 12    set aside the judicial tax deed auction sale. Any such 13    party shall guarantee or secure by bond a bid equal to the 14    successful bid at the judicial tax deed auction. No 15    guarantee or bond shall be required if the property is 16    residential and the party seeking to set aside the sale is 17    the owner-occupant of the property at the time the motion 18    is filed. If the court denies confirmation of the judicial 19    tax deed auction sale, it shall order a new judicial tax 20    deed auction. Any subsequent auction is subject to the 21    same notice requirement as the original auction.22        (5) No sale under this Section shall be held invalid 23    or be set aside because of any immaterial or insignificant 24    defect in the notice thereof or in the publication of the 25    same, or in the proceedings of the officer conducting the 26    sale.  HB4537 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    (h) Notice of surplus proceeds. Within 60 days following 2the deposit of surplus funds with the treasurer of the county, 3the treasurer shall send notice to all parties to which the 4Section 22-10 Take Notice was sent, stating that the owner or 5owners of the property at the time of the sale may submit a 6claim for the surplus funds to the county treasurer or the 7circuit court within 3 years of the date on the notice.8    (i) Upon receipt of a claim for surplus proceeds, the 9county treasurer, being satisfied of the facts in the case, 10shall distribute the surplus proceeds to the proper claimant. 11When the county treasurer is unable to determine the proper 12claimant, the county treasurer shall file a motion with the 13circuit court hearing the underlying tax case, requesting that 14the court determine whether an interested party is the owner 15of record entitled to a disbursement of surplus proceeds. 16Within 30 days following the filing of the motion, the court 17hearing the underlying tax case shall set a hearing to 18determine whether an interested party is the owner of record 19entitled to a disbursement of surplus proceeds. All interested 20parties in the underlying case shall be notified by the county 21treasurer. Any party claiming to have an ownership interest in 22the parcel at the time of the issuance of tax deed may present 23evidence of ownership and request a disbursement of any or all 24surplus proceeds. The court shall issue an order directing the 25treasurer to disburse a specific amount of surplus proceeds to 26specific parties, with sufficient personally identifiable   HB4537 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1information to accurately identify the parties entitled to 2disbursement.3    (j) Upon filing of a motion by a party claiming to be the 4owner of the property at the time of sale, within 30 days 5following the filing of the motion, the court hearing the 6underlying tax case shall set a hearing to determine whether 7an interested party is the owner entitled to a disbursement of 8surplus proceeds. All interested parties in the underlying 9case shall be notified by the movant. Any party claiming to be 10the owner of the property at the time of sale may present 11evidence of ownership and request a disbursement of any or all 12surplus proceeds. The court shall issue an order directing the 13treasurer to disburse a specific amount of surplus proceeds to 14specific parties, with sufficient personally identifiable 15information to accurately identify the parties entitled to 16disbursement.17    (k) Surplus funds that have not been claimed within 3 18years following the date on the county treasurer's notice in 19accordance with subsection (h) of Section 22-42 shall be 20disposed of pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property 21Act.22    (l) Interest earned on surplus proceeds while held by the 23county treasurer shall belong to the lawful claimant and shall 24be paid with the principal amount of the surplus proceeds.  25    (35 ILCS 200/22-65)  HB4537 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    Sec. 22-65. Form of deed. A tax deed executed by the county 2clerk under the official seal of the county shall be recorded 3in the same manner as other conveyances of property, and vests 4in the grantee, his or her heirs and assigns, the title of the 5property therein described without further acknowledgment or 6evidence of the conveyance. Tax Deeds issued under this 7Section shall not require a municipal transfer stamp, or be 8subject to any municipal real estate transfer taxes, 9requirements, or certifications prior to recording. The 10conveyance shall be substantially in the following form:11State of Illinois) 12                 ) ss. 13County of .......)14    At a tax deed auction public sale of property for the 15nonpayment of taxes, held in the county above stated, on 16(insert date), the following described property was sold: 17(here place description of property conveyed). The property 18not having been redeemed from the sale, and it appearing that 19the holder of the certificate of purchase of the property has 20complied with the laws of the State of Illinois necessary to 21entitle (insert him, her or them) to a deed of the property: I 22...., county clerk of the county of ...., in consideration of 23the property and by virtue of the statutes of the State of 24Illinois in such cases provided, grant and convey to ...., his 25or her heirs and assigns forever, the property described 26above.  HB4537 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    Dated (insert date).2Signature of .................. County Clerk3Seal of County of ...., Illinois4(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 5    Section 10. The Mobile Home Local Services Tax Enforcement 6Act is amended by changing Section 255 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 516/255)8    Sec. 255. Sales in error. 9    (a) When, upon application of the county collector, the 10owner of the certificate of purchase, or a municipality that 11owns or has owned the mobile home ordered sold, it appears to 12the satisfaction of the court that ordered the mobile home 13sold that any of the following subsections are applicable, the 14court shall declare the sale to be a sale in error:15        (1) the mobile home was not subject to taxation,16        (1.5) the mobile home has been moved to a different 17    location,18        (2) the taxes had been paid prior to the sale of the 19    mobile home,20        (3) there is a double computation of the tax,21        (4) the description is void for uncertainty,22        (5) the assessor, chief county assessment officer, 23    board of review, board of appeals, or other county 24    official has made an error (other than an error of   HB4537 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    judgment as to the value of any mobile home),2        (5.5) the owner of the mobile home had tendered timely 3    and full payment to the county collector that the owner 4    reasonably believed was due and owing on the mobile home, 5    and the county collector did not apply the payment to the 6    mobile home; provided that this provision applies only to 7    mobile home owners, not their agents or third-party 8    payors,9        (6) prior to the tax sale a voluntary or involuntary 10    petition has been filed by or against the legal or 11    beneficial owner of the mobile home requesting relief 12    under the provisions of 11 U.S.C. Chapter 7, 11, 12, or 13, 13    or14        (7) the mobile home is owned by the United States, the 15    State of Illinois, a municipality, or a taxing district. 16    (b) When, upon application of the owner of the certificate 17of purchase only, it appears to the satisfaction of the court 18that ordered the mobile home sold that any of the following 19subsections are applicable, the court shall declare the sale 20to be a sale in error:21        (1) A voluntary or involuntary petition under the 22    provisions of 11 U.S.C. Chapter 7, 11, 12, or 13 has been 23    filed subsequent to the tax sale and prior to the issuance 24    of the tax certificate of title.25        (2) The mobile home sold has been substantially 26    destroyed or rendered uninhabitable or otherwise unfit for   HB4537 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    occupancy subsequent to the tax sale and prior to the 2    issuance of the tax certificate of title.3    (c) When the county collector discovers, prior to the 4expiration of the period of redemption, that a tax sale should 5not have occurred for one or more of the reasons set forth in 6subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5.5), (a)(6), 7(a)(7), (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(6), or (a)(7) of this Section, the 8county collector shall notify the last known owner of the 9certificate of purchase by certified and regular mail, or 10other means reasonably calculated to provide actual notice, 11that the county collector intends to declare an administrative 12sale in error and of the reasons therefor, including 13documentation sufficient to establish the reason why the sale 14should not have occurred. The owner of the certificate of 15purchase may object in writing within 28 days after the date of 16the mailing by the county collector. If an objection is filed, 17the county collector shall not administratively declare a sale 18in error, but may apply to the circuit court for a sale in 19error as provided in subsection (a) of this Section. Thirty 20days following the receipt of notice by the last known owner of 21the certificate of purchase, or within a reasonable time 22thereafter, the county collector shall make a written 23declaration, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that 24the taxes were sold in error and shall deliver a copy thereof 25to the county clerk within 30 days after the date the 26declaration is made for entry in the tax judgment, sale,   HB4537 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1redemption, and forfeiture record pursuant to subsection (d) 2of this Section. The county collector shall promptly notify 3the last known owner of the certificate of purchase of the 4declaration by regular mail and shall promptly pay the amount 5of the tax sale, together with interest and costs as provided 6in Sections 260 through 280, upon surrender of the original 7certificate of purchase. 8    (d) When the holder of the certificate of purchase is the 9county as trustee for taxing districts, upon request of or 10consent by the county as trustee, or its agent, if the county 11collector agrees, prior to the issuance of a tax certificate 12of sale, that a tax sale should not have occurred for one or 13more of the reasons set forth in subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), 14(a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5.5), (a)(6), (a)(7), or (b)(1) of this 15Section, or, with the consent of the chief county assessment 16officer, subdivisions (a)(1.5), (a)(5), the county collector 17may declare an administrative sale in error. Such declaration 18shall be a written declaration, based on clear and convincing 19evidence, that the taxes were sold in error and the county 20collector shall deliver a copy thereto to the county clerk 21within 30 days after the date the declaration is made for entry 22in the tax judgment, sale, redemption, and forfeiture record. 23If a sale is declared to be a sale in error, the county clerk 24shall make entry in the tax judgment, sale, redemption and 25forfeiture record, that the mobile home was erroneously sold, 26and the county collector shall, on demand of the owner of the   HB4537 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1certificate of purchase, refund the amount paid, pay any 2interest and costs as may be ordered under Sections 260 3through 280, and cancel the certificate so far as it relates to 4the mobile home. The county collector shall deduct from the 5accounts of the appropriate taxing bodies their pro rata 6amounts paid.7(Source: P.A. 98-949, eff. 8-15-14.) 8    Section 15. The Mortgage Rescue Fraud Act is amended by 9changing Sections 5 and 30 as follows: 10    (765 ILCS 940/5)11    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:12    "Distressed property" means residential real property 13consisting of one to 6 family dwelling units that is in 14foreclosure or at risk of loss due to nonpayment of taxes, or 15whose owner is more than 30 days delinquent on any loan that is 16secured by the property.17    "Distressed property consultant" means any person who, 18directly or indirectly, for compensation from the owner, makes 19any solicitation, representation, or offer to perform or who, 20for compensation from the owner, performs any service that the 21person represents will in any manner do any of the following:22        (1) stop or postpone the foreclosure sale or stop or 23    postpone the loss of the home due to nonpayment of taxes;24        (2) obtain any forbearance from any beneficiary or   HB4537 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    mortgagee, or relief with respect to a tax sale of the 2    property;3        (3) assist the owner to exercise any right of 4    reinstatement or right of redemption;5        (4) obtain any extension of the period within which 6    the owner may reinstate the owner's rights with respect to 7    the property;8        (5) obtain any waiver of an acceleration clause 9    contained in any promissory note or contract secured by a 10    mortgage on a distressed property or contained in the 11    mortgage;12        (6) assist the owner in foreclosure, loan default, or 13    post-tax sale redemption period to obtain a loan or 14    advance of funds;15        (7) avoid or ameliorate the impairment of the owner's 16    credit resulting from the recording of a notice of default 17    or the conduct of a foreclosure sale or tax sale; or18        (8) save the owner's residence from foreclosure or 19    save the owner from loss of home due to nonpayment of 20    taxes.21    A "distressed property consultant" does not include any of 22the following:23        (1) a person or the person's authorized agent acting 24    under the express authority or written approval of the 25    Department of Housing and Urban Development;26        (2) a person who holds or is owed an obligation   HB4537 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    secured by a lien on any distressed property, or a person 2    acting under the express authorization or written approval 3    of such person, when the person performs services in 4    connection with the obligation or lien, if the obligation 5    or lien did not arise as the result of or as part of a 6    proposed distressed property conveyance;7        (3) banks, savings banks, savings and loan 8    associations, credit unions, and insurance companies 9    organized, chartered, or holding a certificate of 10    authority to do business under the laws of this State or 11    any other state or under the laws of the United States;12        (4) attorneys licensed in Illinois engaged in the 13    practice of law;14        (5) a Department of Housing and Urban Development 15    approved mortgagee and any subsidiary or affiliate of 16    these persons or entities, and any agent or employee of 17    these persons or entities, while engaged in the business 18    of these persons or entities; 19        (6) a 501(c)(3) nonprofit agency or organization, 20    doing business for no less than 5 years, that offers 21    counseling or advice to an owner of a distressed property, 22    if they do not contract for services with for-profit 23    lenders or distressed property purchasers, or any person 24    who structures or plans such a transaction;25        (7) (blank);26        (8) licensees of the Consumer Installment Loan Act who   HB4537 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    are authorized to make loans secured by real property; or2        (9) licensees of the Real Estate License Act of 2000 3    when providing licensed activities.4    "Distressed property purchaser" means any person who 5solicits an owner of distressed property and acquires any 6interest in fee in a distressed property or a beneficial 7interest in a trust holding title to a distressed property 8while allowing the owner to possess, occupy, or retain any 9present or future interest in fee in the property, or any 10person who participates in a joint venture or joint enterprise 11involving a distressed property conveyance. "Distressed 12property purchaser" does not mean any person who acquires 13distressed property at a short sale or any person acting in 14participation with any person who acquires distressed property 15at a short sale, if that person does not promise to convey an 16interest in fee back to the owner or does not give the owner an 17option to purchase the property at a later date.18    "Distressed property conveyance" means a transaction in 19which an owner of a distressed property transfers an interest 20in fee in the distressed property or in which the holder of all 21or some part of the beneficial interest in a trust holding 22title to a distressed property transfers that interest; the 23acquirer of the property allows the owner of the distressed 24property to occupy the property; and the acquirer of the 25property or a person acting in participation with the acquirer 26of the property conveys or promises to convey an interest in   HB4537 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1fee back to the owner or gives the owner an option to purchase 2the property at a later date.3    "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, 4limited liability company, association, or other group or 5entity, however organized.6    "Service" means, without limitation, any of the following:7        (1) debt, budget, or financial counseling of any type;8        (2) receiving money for the purpose of distributing it 9    to creditors in payment or partial payment of any 10    obligation secured by a lien on a distressed property;11        (3) contacting creditors on behalf of an owner of a 12    residence that is distressed property;13        (4) arranging or attempting to arrange for an 14    extension of the period within which the owner of a 15    distressed property may cure the owner's default and 16    reinstate his or her obligation; 17        (5) arranging or attempting to arrange for any delay 18    or postponement of the time of sale of the distressed 19    property;20        (6) advising the filing of any document or assisting 21    in any manner in the preparation of any document for 22    filing with any court; or23        (7) giving any advice, explanation, or instruction to 24    an owner of a distressed property that in any manner 25    relates to the cure of a default or forfeiture or to the 26    postponement or avoidance of sale of the distressed   HB4537 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    property. 2(Source: P.A. 94-822, eff. 1-1-07; 95-691, eff. 6-1-08; 395-1047, eff. 4-6-09.) 4    (765 ILCS 940/30)5    Sec. 30. Distressed property conveyance contract terms. 6Every contract required by Section 25 must contain the entire 7agreement of the parties, be fully assignable, and survive 8delivery of any instrument of conveyance of the distressed 9property. Every lease entered into pursuant to a contract 10required by Section 25 is terminable at will by the distressed 11property owner, without liability. Every contract required by 12Section 25 must include the following terms:13        (1) the name, business address, and the telephone 14    number of the distressed property purchaser;15        (2) the address of the distressed property;16        (3) the total consideration to be given by the 17    distressed property purchaser or tax lien payor in 18    connection with or incident to the sale;19        (4) a complete description of the terms of payment or 20    other consideration including, but not limited to, any 21    services of any nature that the distressed property 22    purchaser represents he or she will perform for the owner 23    of the distressed property before or after the sale;24        (5) a complete description of the terms of any related 25    agreement designed to allow the owner of the distressed   HB4537 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    property to remain in the home such as a rental agreement, 2    repurchase agreement, contract for deed, or lease with 3    option to buy;4        (6) a notice of cancellation as provided in this 5    Section;6        (7) the following notice in at least 12-point boldface 7    type, if the contract is printed, or in capital letters, 8    if the contract is typed, and completed with the name of 9    the distressed property purchaser, immediately above the 10    statement required by this Section:11"NOTICE REQUIRED BY ILLINOIS LAW12        Until your right to cancel this contract has ended, 13    ..................(Name) or anyone working for 14    ...................(Name) CANNOT ask you to sign or have 15    you sign any deed or any other document. You are urged to 16    have this contract reviewed by an attorney of your choice 17    within 5 business days of signing it."; and 18        (8) if title to the distressed property will be 19    transferred in the conveyance transaction, the following 20    notice in at least 14-point boldface type if the contract 21    is printed, or in capital letters if the contract is 22    typed, and completed with the name of the distressed 23    property purchaser, immediately above the statement 24    required by this Section:25"NOTICE REQUIRED BY ILLINOIS LAW26        As part of this transaction, you are giving up title   HB4537 Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 18570 RTM 32013 b1    to your home."; and .2        (9) if a distressed property is at risk of loss for the 3    non-payment of real estate taxes, a statement that the 4    property owner may have the right to obtain money for any 5    equity lost if a tax deed is issued, either through the 6    right to indemnity or public auction, that the property 7    owner will lose the right to claim the surplus equity if 8    the property owner sells the property, and that the 9    property owner should consult an attorney to discuss the 10    property owner's options before selling the property. 11(Source: P.A. 94-822, eff. 1-1-07.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.